Utah statutes.
59-25-109.   Penalties and interest.

An owner or operator of a hazardous waste facility or nonhazardous solid waste facility who fails to comply with this chapter is subject to penalties and interest as provided in Sections 59-1-401 and 59-1-402.



Enacted by Chapter 295, 2003 General Session

